Nevada, session 83, AB599.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388D of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. To participate in the Nevada Educational Choice
Scholarship Program, a scholarship organization must register
with the Department of Education by providing:
1. On a form provided by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction:
(a) The name, address and contact information of the
scholarship organization; and
(b) If the scholarship organization uses a fiscal year other
than July 1 to June 30, the period of the fiscal year used by the
scholarship organization;
2. Evidence of an official declaration by the Internal Revenue
Service that the scholarship organization qualifies as a tax-exempt
organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
3. Confirmation that the scholarship organization is
incorporated pursuant to chapter 82 of NRS;
4. A copy of the written procedures established pursuant to
subsection 2 of section 7 of this act; and
5. An affidavit signed by the chief executive officer or
president or chair of the board of directors of the scholarship
organization under penalty of perjury stating that:
(a) No member of the board of directors or employee of the
scholarship organization:
(1) Has declared bankruptcy within the 7 years immediately
preceding the date on which the affidavit is submitted; or
(2) Has ever been convicted of a felony; and
(b) Neither the scholarship organization nor any member of
the board of directors or employee thereof owns or operates a
school in this State that receives grant money from the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
-
*AB599*

– 4 –
Sec. 3. 1. Each scholarship organization that is registered
with the Department of Education pursuant to section 2 of this act
shall:
(a) Not later than October 15, January 15, March 15 and
June 15 of each year, provide to the Department in a format
prescribed by the Department an electronic list of each pupil on
behalf of whom the scholarship organization awarded a grant
pursuant to NRS 388D.270 for the previous quarter. The
electronic list must include:
(1) Demographic information for each pupil, including,
without limitation, the name, date of birth, grade level, gender and
race or ethnicity of the pupil, whether the pupil has a disability,
the household income of the pupil calculated pursuant to section 7
of this act and the name and address of the parent or guardian of
the pupil;
(2) The amount of each grant provided on behalf of a
pupil;
(3) Whether the pupil received any other scholarships in
addition to the grant;
(4) The manner in which money from each grant has been
used, including, without limitation:
(I) The name of each school that has received money
from a grant;
(II) The tuition and fees charged by each school; and
(III) Any portion of such money that has been used to
pay for transportation to and from the school; and
(5) The number of applications for a grant received by the
scholarship organization for which a grant was not awarded and
the reason that a grant was not awarded in each case.
(b) Annually submit to the Department the name of:
(1) The school attended by each pupil on whose behalf a
grant is provided during the school year immediately preceding
the school year for which the grant is awarded or, if such a pupil
was not enrolled in a school, whether the pupil was a
homeschooled child, an opt-in child or was not required to attend
school pursuant to NRS 392.040 for that school year; and
(2) The last public school, if any, attended by each pupil on
whose behalf a grant is provided.
2. The Department of Education shall annually:
(a) Compile the information submitted by each scholarship
organization pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) Review the information to determine whether to
recommend legislation to revise the priority for awarding grants to
the Legislature.
-
*AB599*

– 5 –
Sec. 4. Each scholarship organization that is registered with
the Department of Education pursuant to section 2 of this act
shall:
1. Not more than 180 days after the conclusion of the fiscal
year of the scholarship organization, submit to the Department of
Education a copy of an audited or compiled financial statement of
the scholarship organization prepared by an independent certified
public accountant.
2. If the scholarship organization no longer meets the
qualifications prescribed by law to participate in the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program as a scholarship
organization or ceases to exist, notify the Department within 30
days. Upon receiving such notification, the Department of
Education shall update the directory maintained pursuant to
section 6 of this act and notify the Department of Taxation.
3. Within 72 hours after receiving notice from the
Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee, make
any financial records of the scholarship organization or records
concerning a pupil maintained by the scholarship organization
available to the Superintendent or his or her designee for
inspection during regular business hours.
Sec. 5. 1. A scholarship organization that is registered with
the Department of Education pursuant to section 2 of this act shall
notify the Department of Taxation in writing not more than 10
days after receiving a donation from a taxpayer pursuant to NRS
363A.139 or 363B.119, as applicable, of the amount of the
donation.
2. Any donation received by a scholarship organization must
not be carried forward for more than 5 years after the last day on
the calendar year in which the donation is made.
Sec. 6. The Department of Education shall:
1. Maintain on its Internet website a directory of each
scholarship organization that is registered with the Department
pursuant to section 2 of this act and, not later than September 30,
December 30, March 30 and June 30 of each year, submit to the
Department of Taxation a list of each such scholarship
organization.
2. Not later than March 30 of each year, submit to the
Governor, the State Board of Education and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau a summary of the information
reported to the Department by each scholarship organization
pursuant to NRS 388D.280.
Sec. 7. 1. The parent or guardian of a pupil who meets the
requirements to receive a grant pursuant to NRS 388D.270 may
apply to a scholarship organization registered with the Department
-
*AB599*

– 6 –
of Education pursuant to section 2 of this act for such a grant. A
scholarship organization may charge each family that applies for
a grant on behalf of one or more children of the family an
administrative fee of not more than $25.
2. A scholarship organization shall:
(a) Establish written procedures that the scholarship
organization will use to determine whether a pupil meets the
requirements to receive a grant pursuant to NRS 388D.270 and to
award grants on behalf of pupils.
(b) Post the procedures established pursuant to paragraph (a)
on an Internet website maintained by the scholarship organization
and provide a written copy of the procedures with each application
form.
(c) Provide an application form to be completed by an
applicant for a grant. A scholarship organization may only award
a grant on behalf of a pupil for whom a complete application is
submitted but is not required to award a grant to a pupil solely
because his or her application is complete.
(d) Verify annually that each pupil on behalf of whom the
scholarship organization awards a grant is a member of a
household that has a household income which is not more than
300 percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty.
Such verification must:
(1) Use the most recent federal poverty guidelines published
in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health
and Human Services; and
(2) Calculate household income based on the information
reported in the application submitted on behalf of the pupil and in
accordance with the most recent guidance established by the Food
and Nutrition Service of the United State Department of
Agriculture for determining eligibility of pupils for free and
reduced-price meals.
3. A scholarship organization shall award grants on behalf of
pupils in the following order of priority:
(a) A grant must be awarded for the current school year on
behalf of a pupil for whom a completed application was received
on or before the deadline for the submission of such applications
by the scholarship organization and on whose behalf a grant was
awarded for the immediately preceding school year before a grant
is awarded on behalf of any other pupil.
(b) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil for whom a
completed application was received on or before the deadline for
the submission of such applications by the scholarship
organization and who is the sibling of a pupil on whose behalf a
-
*AB599*

– 7 –
grant has been awarded for the current school year before a grant
is awarded on behalf of other pupils.
(c) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil who is not
described in paragraph (a) or (b) in the order in which the
completed application is received. If there are an insufficient
number of grants available to award a grant on behalf of each
pupil for whom a complete application was received on the same
day:
(1) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil who is a
member of a household that has a lower household income before
a grant is awarded on behalf of a pupil who is a member of a
household that has a higher household income;
(2) If two or more applicants are members of households
that have the same household income, a grant must be awarded on
behalf of the pupil who is enrolled in a public school that has
received a lower rating based on the most recent annual report of
the statewide system of accountability for public schools before a
grant is awarded on behalf of a pupil who is enrolled in a public
school that has received higher ratings; and
(3) If two or more applicants are members of households
that have the same household income and attend public schools
that received the same rating based on the most recent annual
report of the statewide system of accountability for public schools,
grants must be awarded on behalf of pupils in this category on a
random basis.
Sec. 8. NRS 388D.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.250 NRS 363A.139, 363B.119 and 388D.250 to
388D.280, inclusive, and sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act may
be cited as the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
Sec. 9. NRS 388D.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.260 As used in NRS 388D.250 to 388D.280, inclusive,
and sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, “scholarship organization” means an
organization in this State that meets the requirements set forth in
NRS 388D.270.
Sec. 10. NRS 388D.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.270 1. A scholarship organization must:
(a) Be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(b) Not own or operate any school in this State, including,
without limitation, a private school, which receives any grant money
pursuant to the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
(c) Accept donations from taxpayers and other persons and may
also solicit and accept gifts and grants.
-
*AB599*

– 8 –
(d) Not expend more than 5 percent of the total amount of
money accepted pursuant to paragraph (c) to pay its administrative
expenses.
(e) Provide grants on behalf of pupils who are members of a
household that has a household income which is not more than 300
percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty to allow
those pupils to attend schools in this State chosen by the parents or
legal guardians of those pupils, including, without limitation, private
schools. The total amount of a grant provided by the scholarship
organization on behalf of a pupil pursuant to this paragraph must not
exceed $7,755 for Fiscal Year 2015-2016.
(f) Not limit to a single school the schools for which it provides
grants.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), not limit to
specific pupils the grants provided pursuant to that paragraph.
2. The maximum amount of a grant provided by the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 1
must be adjusted on July 1 of each year for the fiscal year beginning
that day and ending June 30 in a rounded dollar amount
corresponding to the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index (All Items) published by the United States Department of
Labor for the preceding calendar year. On May 1 of each year, the
Department of Education shall determine the amount of increase
required by this subsection, establish the adjusted amounts to take
effect on July 1 of that year and notify each scholarship organization
of the adjusted amounts. The Department of Education shall also
post the adjusted amounts on its Internet website.
3. A grant provided on behalf of a pupil pursuant to subsection
1 must be paid directly to the school chosen by the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil.
4. A scholarship organization shall provide each taxpayer and
other person who makes a donation, gift or grant of money to the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1
with an affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, which includes,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the scholarship organization satisfies the
requirements set forth in subsection 1; and
(b) The total amount of the donation, gift or grant made to the
scholarship organization.
5. Each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
provided by a scholarship organization shall maintain a record of the
academic progress of the pupil. The record must be maintained in
such a manner that the information may be aggregated and reported
for all such pupils . [if reporting is required by the regulations of the
Department of Education.] On or before August 1 of each year,
-
*AB599*

– 9 –
each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
provided by a scholarship organization shall submit to the
Department of Education a report on the academic progress of all
such pupils enrolled in the school during the immediately
preceding school year. The report must be in such form as the
Department may prescribe by regulation and:
(a) Include, without limitation:
(1) The name and grade level of each such pupil;
(2) Information concerning the academic performance of
each such pupil, including, without limitation, grades and
progress assessments;
(3) Information concerning any disciplinary action taken
against each such pupil, including, without limitation, if the pupil
was suspended or expelled; and
(4) A comparison of the academic performance of each
such pupil during the immediately preceding school year and the
school year before that, if the pupil attended the school both years
or information is otherwise available for both years.
(b) Be accompanied by a statement signed by the owner,
executive head or chair of the governing body of the school
certifying under penalty of perjury that, to the best of his or her
knowledge or belief, the information included in the report is
complete and accurate.
6. The Department of Education:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the contents of and
procedures for applications for grants provided pursuant to
subsection 1.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Department
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(c) Shall compile and analyze the data submitted by schools
pursuant to subsection 5 to evaluate the impact of the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program and submit, on or
before February 1 of each year, an anonymized summary of the
data and any recommendations for legislation to:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The State Board of Education; and
(3) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature; and
(II) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
7. The reporting required pursuant to subsections 5 and 6
must be performed in a manner that complies with the Family
-
*AB599*

– 10 –
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g,
and any other applicable state and federal privacy laws.
8. If a school fails to comply with the provisions of subsection
5, the Department of Education may suspend or disqualify the
school from receiving grants on behalf of pupils under the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program. A scholarship
organization shall not make a grant on behalf of a pupil to a
school that has been suspended or disqualified from receiving
grants pursuant to this subsection.
9. As used in this section, “private school” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 394.103.
Sec. 11. NRS 363A.139 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363A.139 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363A.130 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
-
*AB599*

– 11 –
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 4 of NRS 363B.119 is [$6,655,000.] :
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $8,725,000; and
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and each subsequent fiscal
year, $10,725,000.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in addition
to the amount of credits authorized by subsection 4 for Fiscal Years
2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the Department of Taxation
may approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1
for each of those fiscal years until the total amount of the credits
authorized by subsection 1 and approved by the Department of
Taxation pursuant to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS
363B.119 is $4,745,000. The provisions of subsection 4 do not
apply to the amount of credits authorized by this subsection and the
amount of credits authorized by this subsection must not be
considered when determining the amount of credits authorized for a
fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in Fiscal Year 2019-2020,
2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of credits authorized by
subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is less than $4,745,000, the
remaining amount of credits pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 must be carried forward and made
available for approval during subsequent fiscal years until the total
amount of credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant
to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is equal to
$14,235,000. The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant
to subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized pursuant to this subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
-
*AB599*

– 12 –
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 12. NRS 363B.119 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363B.119 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363B.110 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 4 of NRS 363A.139 is [$6,655,000.] :
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $8,725,000; and
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and each subsequent fiscal
year, $10,725,000.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
-
*AB599*

– 13 –
5. In addition to the amount of credits authorized by subsection
4 for Fiscal Years 2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the
Department of Taxation may approve applications for the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for each of those fiscal years until the
total amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection
and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is $4,745,000. The provisions of
subsection 4 do not apply to the amount of credits authorized by this
subsection and the amount of credits authorized by this subsection
must not be considered when determining the amount of credits
authorized for a fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in Fiscal
Year 2019-2020, 2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of credits
authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this subsection
and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is less than $4,745,000, the
remaining amount of credits pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 must be carried forward and made
available for approval during subsequent fiscal years until the total
amount of credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant
to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is equal to
$14,235,000. The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant
to subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized pursuant to this subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 13. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration
of the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in
-
*AB599*

– 14 –
NRS 218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
May 26, 2025.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB599*